Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,176
Department of Health and Human Services; contracts authorized.

The Department of Health and Human Services, in carrying out obligations under the Health Maintenance Organization Act, may contract with qualified persons to make recommendations concerning the determinations required to be made. Such recommendations may be accepted in full or in part by the department.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 85;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 257;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 196.